Nebraska, session 109, LB982.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB982 LB982
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $10,000,000 from the
General Fund for FY2026-27 to the Public Service Commission, for Program
793, Broadband Bridge, for continued implementation of the Broadband
Bridge Program.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-